Massachusetts, session 194th, S2056.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 4 of Chapter 62 of the general laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking the first sentence and replacing it with the following:-
“Residents over the age of 18 shall be taxed on their taxable income, and non-residents
over the age of 18 shall be taxed to the extent specified in section 5A on their taxable income, as
follows”.
of 1